Louisiana, session 2026, SB175.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 6:412(D) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 6:412(E) is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§412. Unauthorized use of the word "bank" or similar words
* * *
D. Nothing in this Section or any other provision of law shall be
construed to prevent any FDIC-insured depository institution operating within
the state from using a trade or assumed name that is different from the
institution's corporate name or title, provided the corporate name or title is
used together with the trade or assumed name and is in compliance with
applicable federal laws and regulations.
E. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prevent the use of the word
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-426 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 175
"trust", "trustee", "trust company" or any word of similar import as part of a name
or title in a context clearly not purporting to refer to engaging in a general trust,
trustee, or trust company business.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.